California statutes. Water Code
Sales of bonds or registered warrants purchased pursuant to this article and held shall be made in season so that the proceeds may be applied to the purposes for which the money with which the bonds or registered warrants were originally purchased was placed in the treasury of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Bonds [31370. - 31482.]



  ARTICLE 1. Notice [31370. - 31372.]

31370.

Whenever the board deems it necessary for the district to incur a bonded indebtedness, it shall by resolution set forth all of the following:

(a) A declaration of the necessity for the indebtedness.

(b) The purpose for which the proposed debt is to be incurred.

(c) The amount of the proposed debt.

(d) The time and place for a hearing by the board on the questions:

(1) Will the whole or only a portion of the district be benefited by the accomplishment of the purpose?

(2) If only a portion of the district will be benefited, what portion will be so benefited?

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31371.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by the secretary by publication of a copy of the resolution in a newspaper printed and published in the district for at least two weeks or, if there is no newspaper printed and published in the district, by posting a copy of the resolution in three public places within the district at least two weeks before the time fixed for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31372.

The copy of the resolution published or posted shall be accompanied by a notice subscribed by the secretary, with the seal of the district attached, that:

(a) The hearing referred to in the resolution will be had at the time and place specified in the resolution.

(b) At that time and place any person interested, including all persons owning property in the district, will be heard upon the questions stated in the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Hearing [31385. - 31393.]

31385.

At the time and place fixed for the hearing in the resolution declaring the necessity for incurring the bonded indebtedness, or at any time and place to which the hearing is adjourned, the board shall proceed with the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31386.

At the hearing any person interested, including persons owning property within the district, may appear and present any matters material to the questions set forth in the resolution declaring the necessity for incurring the bonded indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31387.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the board shall by resolution determine whether the whole or part of the district will be benefited by the accomplishment of the purpose stated in the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31388.

If the board determines that the whole of the district will not be benefited, the resolution shall also describe the portion of the district which will be benefited, in a manner sufficient for identification, which portion of the district described in the resolution shall thereupon constitute and be known as “Improvement District No. _______ of _______ County Water District.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31389.

After the formation of an improvement district within a district pursuant to this article, all proceedings for the purpose of a bond election within the improvement district and for the purpose of taxation for the payment of the bonds and interest shall be limited, and apply only to the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31390.

The determination of the board that the whole of the district will be benefited by the bond issue or that only a described portion of the district will be benefited by the bond issue is final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31391.

After the board has made its determination pursuant to Section 31387, if it deems it necessary to incur the bonded indebtedness, it shall by resolution state:

(a) That it deems it necessary to incur the bonded indebtedness.

(b) The purpose for which the bonded indebtedness will be incurred.

(c) Either of the following in accordance with its previous determination:

(1) That the whole of the district will be benefited by incurring the bonded indebtedness.

(2) That a portion of the district will be benefited by incurring the bonded indebtedness, which portion shall be described as it is described in the resolution of the board made pursuant to Section 31387.

(d) The amount of debt to be incurred.

(e) The maximum term the bonds to be issued shall run before maturity, which term shall not exceed 40 years from the date of the bonds or any series thereof. 

(f) The annual rate of interest to be paid which rate shall not exceed 8 percent, payable annually or semiannually.

(g) The proposition to be submitted to the voters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

31392.

In determining the amount of debt to be incurred, the legislative body may include:

(a) All costs and estimated costs incidental to or connected with the acquisition, construction, improving or financing of the project.

(b) All engineering, inspection, legal and fiscal agent’s fees, costs of the bond election and of the issuance of said bonds, and bond interest estimated to accrue during the construction period and for a period of not to exceed 12 months after completion of construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 962.)
-------------------------------------------

31393.

(a) Any time following the establishment of an improvement district pursuant to this article, the board, by a four-fifths majority vote, may exempt part or all of the territory within the improvement district from liability for payment of principal, interest, and any other amounts which become due on account of any outstanding or then authorized but thereafter issued bonds of the county water district other than bonds issued for the improvement district. The board may adopt a resolution pursuant to this section only if it first makes all of the following findings:

(1) Bonds for the improvement district have received the voter approval required by this chapter and part or all of the improvement district bonds have been issued to provide benefit to the improvement district.

(2) The territory for which exemption is proposed was annexed to the district after the bonds of the county water district were authorized and prior to formation of the improvement district.

(3) The territory proposed for exemption from the county water district bonds receives or will receive greater benefit from the improvement district bonds than it receives or will receive from county water district bonds from which the territory is proposed for exemption.

(b) When the county water district adopts a resolution pursuant to this section, it shall file it, together with a sufficient description of the territory to be exempted from the bonded indebtedness, in accordance with Section 54902 of the Government Code. The county assessor and the State Board of Equalization shall give the resolution the same effect as a term and condition adopted pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 56470 of the Government Code; provided, however, the effective date of the resolution for tax purposes shall be determined by the filing date in accordance with Sections 54902 and 54902.1 of the Government Code. 

(c) The provisions of this section apply only to the Yorba Linda County Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 693, Sec. 1.   Effective September 2, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Election [31405. - 31416.]

31405.

The board shall fix a date when an election shall be held to authorize the bonded indebtedness described in the resolution adopted pursuant to Section 31391.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31406.

The board shall provide for holding the election on the day fixed therefor in the same manner as provided by law in respect to general water district elections so far as applicable, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 278.)
-------------------------------------------

31407.

The board shall give notice of the election to authorize the bonded indebtedness, which notice shall contain all of the following:

(a) The resolution adopted pursuant to Section 31391 calling the election.

(b) The boundaries of voting precincts, which shall include only the portion of the district specified in the resolution.

(c) The location of polling places.

(d) The names of the officers selected to conduct the election in each precinct, who shall consist of one judge, one inspector, and two clerks.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31408.

Every voter residing within the voting precincts, but no others, may vote at the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31408.5.

In the Pleasant Valley County Water District, every owner of land within the district, but no others, may vote at the election.

The special provisions of this section are necessary because in the Pleasant Valley County Water District much of the land is owned by persons living in the nearby communities of Oxnard, Ventura, Camarillo, and other nearby towns and many of the persons residing on the land are not the owners of the land and the owners may wish to undertake financing through a bond issue. The owners of the land within the district are the ones primarily concerned with the district and the ones who will bear the cost of financing and not the resident nonowners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

31409.

The notice shall be published for two weeks in at least one newspaper, designated by the board, printed and published in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31410.

If there is no newspaper printed and published in the district, the notice shall be posted in three public places in whichever of the following is to be benefited:

(a) The district.

(b) An improvement district therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31411.

The returns of the election shall be made to and the votes canvassed by the board on the first Monday which is six or more days after the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 279.)
-------------------------------------------

31412.

The results of the election shall be ascertained and declared pursuant to the general water district election laws so far as they may be applicable, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 278.)
-------------------------------------------

31413.

As soon as the result is declared, the secretary shall enter in the records of the board a statement of the result.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31414.

No informalities in the conduct of the election shall invalidate the election if fairly conducted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31415.

All the expenses of holding the election shall be borne by the district, but said expenses may be included in the amount of the debt to be incurred, as provided in Section 31392, and the district may be reimbursed for bond election expenditures from the proceeds of the sale of bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 962.)
-------------------------------------------

31416.

Whenever the electors of a district which has no bonded indebtedness, is not operating a water system, and has not bona fide contracted for the construction of an adequate water system for the district, have refused to authorize the issuance of bonds at three elections, the last of which was held in 1948 or thereafter, no further bond elections shall be held until the question of dissolution has been submitted to the electors as provided in Section 32858 of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 896.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Issuance [31425. - 31429.]

31425.

If from the bond election returns it appears that more than two-thirds of the votes cast at the election are in favor of incurring the indebtedness, the board may, by resolution, at the time or times it deems proper, provide for the following:

(a) The form of the bonds.

(b) The execution of the bonds.

The board may divide the aggregate principal amount of any issue of bonds authorized in accordance with a proposal submitted to and approved by the eligible voters of the district into two or more series and may fix different dates for the bonds of each series. The bonds of any one series may be made payable at different times from those of any other series, provided that the maturity of each series shall comply with this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

31426.

The district may dispose of the bonds so issued at the times or in the manner the board deems to be to the public interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31427.

Any bonds issued by any district organized under the provisions of this act are hereby given the same force, value and use as bonds issued by any municipality and shall be exempt from all taxation within the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31428.

All premiums and accrued interest received on the sale of bonds shall be placed in the fund to be used for the payment of principal and interest on the bonds, and the remainder of the proceeds of the bonds shall be placed in the treasury to the credit of the proper improvement fund and applied exclusively to the purpose and object recited in the resolution provided for in Section 31391. When the purpose and object has been accomplished any moneys remaining in such improvement fund shall be transferred to the fund to be used for payment of principal and interest on the bonds. When the purpose and object has been accomplished and all principal and interest on the bonds have been paid, any balance of money then remaining shall be transferred to the general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31429.

When the board determines by resolution that the expenditure of money raised by the sale of bonds for the purpose for which the bonds were voted is impractical or unwise, it may call a special election to obtain the consent of the electors to use the money for some other specified district purpose.

The election procedure shall be the same as when the bond proposition was originally submitted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Refunding [31440. - 31446.]

31440.

The board may, by resolution, do the following:

(a) Submit to the voters a measure to issue new bonds to refund any or all of the district bonds outstanding.

(b) Submit to the voters of any improvement district of the district a measure to issue new bonds to refund any improvement district bonds outstanding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31441.

The measure may be voted on at any district election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31442.

The procedure upon the election shall be in accordance, so far as applicable, with the procedure upon an original issue of bonds, except that:

(a) No hearing need be held upon the question whether the bond issue will benefit the entire district or only a portion thereof.

(b) The vote of a majority of the voters voting upon the measure is sufficient to authorize the issue of refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31443.

The refunding bonds shall not bear a higher rate of interest than the bonds to be refunded and may be issued and sold in the manner and form prescribed for an original issue of bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31444.

Refunding bonds may, if the holders of bonds of an original issue and the board so agree, be exchanged for original bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31445.

The face value of refunding bonds exchanged for original bonds shall not exceed the face value of the original bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31446.

The board may raise money by water rates or taxes to pay principal and interest of the refunding bonds in the same manner as prescribed for payment of bonds of an original issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Callable Bonds [31460. - 31461.]

31460.

Any bonds issued by the district may be subject to call and redemption prior to maturity at such times and prices and upon such other terms as the board may specify.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1567.)
-------------------------------------------

31461.

When bonds are made callable, a statement to that effect shall be set forth on the face of the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Revenue Bonds [31480. - 31482.]

31480.

Subject to the provisions of this article, a district may borrow money to provide funds to pay all costs of any public improvement authorized by this part and may issue revenue bonds to evidence the indebtedness created by such borrowing.

Such revenue bonds shall constitute special obligations and evidence a special indebtedness of the district which shall be a charge upon, and payable, as to the principal thereof, interest thereon, and any premiums upon the redemption of any thereof, solely from, such revenues and funds as are specified therein and in the proceeding for their issuance. They shall not constitute general obligations of the district and they shall neither constitute obligations nor evidence any indebtedness of any other public agency of which the district may be a part, or of the State.

All such bonds shall recite upon their face the substance of the preceding portions of this section and shall also recite upon their face that they are issued under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1590.)
-------------------------------------------

31481.

Revenue bonds under this article shall be authorized, issued and sold in the same manner as are revenue bonds of irrigation districts under Division 11 of this code and shall in all respects conform to the provisions of that part as near as such provisions can be made applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1590.)
-------------------------------------------

31482.

The Contra Costa Water District may provide for bonds of the district to bear a variable interest rate, which rate shall not at any time exceed the maximum rate permitted by Section 53531 of the Government Code or any other applicable provision. If the rate of interest is variable, the resolution adopted pursuant to Section 31391 shall state the manner and intervals at which the rate shall vary, and all bonds shall recite on their face the manner and the intervals at which the rate may vary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Adoption of Improvement Acts [31500. - 31548.]



  ARTICLE 1. Authorization of Improvements [31500. - 31506.]

31500.

Whenever, in the opinion of the board, the public interest or convenience may require, it may order to be done in, under, or upon the whole or any portion of any one or more of the streets or public places of the district, or any property or rights of way owned by the district, any work or improvement for supplying or distributing an irrigation, domestic, or other water supply or for fire protection, or for collecting, treating, and disposing of sewage, waste, and storm waters, and provide that the cost thereof shall be assessed upon the lots and lands fronting on the streets or public places, or upon any district to be assessed therefor, which district need not be composed of lands contiguous to each other.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 451.)
-------------------------------------------

31501.

The work or improvement shall be done and the cost thereof assessed and collected in accordance with the procedure and in pursuance of the provisions of the Improvement Act of 1911.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31502.

The Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 is also applicable to districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

31503.

The Improvement Bond Act of 1915 is also so applicable for use in conjunction with the Improvement Act of 1911 or with other improvement acts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31504.

Such acts or any of them may be used in the discretion of the board of directors in the contruction of any work to be done or improvements made under this act and in the levying of assessments and reassessments and the issuing of bonds to pay for costs and expenses of the work and improvements done or to be done hereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31506.

A district may enter into an agreement with any municipality within the district whereby any work or improvement constructed pursuant to the provisions of the Improvement Act of 1911 may be transferred to the municipality for operation and maintenance. The power to make such an agreement is conditioned upon a finding by the board that the residents of the district would be better served by such municipal operation and maintenance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1030.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definition of Improvement Act Terms [31520. - 31529.]

31520.

As used in the laws referred to in this chapter the terms therefrom set forth in this article refer for the purposes of this chapter to that which this article states each respectively refers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31521.

“City” refers to county water district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31522.

“City council” or “legislative body” refers to the board of directors of the county water district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31523.

“Mayor” refers to the president of the board of directors of the county water district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31524.

“Clerk” refers to the secretary of the board of directors of the county water district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31525.

“Council chambers” refers to the place designated by the board of directors of the county water district for holding its regular meetings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31526.

“Treasurer” refers to the auditor of the county water district, unless the district elects to use the county treasurer as provided in Section 31305, in which case it is the county treasurer as ex officio treasurer of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1318.)
-------------------------------------------

31527.

“Superintendent of streets” or “street superintendent” and “city engineer” refer to the engineer of the county water district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31528.

“Right of way” refers to any parcel of land through which a right of way has been granted to the county water district for any purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31529.

All words relating to municipal officers and matters refer to the corresponding officers of county water districts and matters under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Engineer of Work [31545. - 31548.]

31545.

The board may appoint officers other than the engineer, without compensation, as the officer to perform any or all of the duties conferred upon the street superintendent or city engineer in any law referred to in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31546.

The board may appoint an engineer of work, in which event the duties to be performed by the city engineer as set forth in any law referred to in this chapter shall be performed by the engineer of work, whose compensation and expenses shall constitute an incidental expense in the cost of the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31547.

The board may provide that the work shall be done under the direction and to the satisfaction of the engineer of work, that the materials used shall comply with his specifications and be to his satisfaction, and that he shall make and sign the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31548.

The contract shall be entered into by the engineer, and the assessment and warrant, when confirmed, shall be recorded in the office of the engineer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Improvement Districts [31575. - 31579.]

31575.

Improvement districts may be formed in districts in the same manner as improvement districts are formed in irrigation districts. When formed, such improvement districts shall be governed in the same manner and shall have the same powers as improvement districts in irrigation districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1652.)
-------------------------------------------

31576.

The board of directors of a district shall have the same rights, powers, duties and responsibilities with respect to the formation and government of improvement districts in districts as the board of directors of an irrigation district has with respect to improvement districts in irrigation districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1052.)
-------------------------------------------

31577.

Assessments in an improvement district in a district shall be levied, collected and enforced at the same time and in as nearly the same manner as practicable as annual taxes for purposes of the district in which formed, except that the assessment shall be made in the same manner as provided with respect to improvement districts in irrigation districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1052.)
-------------------------------------------

31578.

If an improvement district is formed in the Kings County Water District to encompass all or a portion of the area within the district served by the Lakeside Ditch Company (a mutual water company) for the purpose of acquiring stock of such company, operating the system of such company, and furnishing the shareholders thereof with water, the voters in such improvement district may elect an advisory board of five members. The members of such advisory board first elected shall be elected at the election of district directors next held following the formation of the improvement district. The members of the advisory board shall be elected in the same manner as district directors. The members first elected shall at their first meeting classify themselves by lot so that three members shall hold office for two years and two members shall hold office for four years. Thereafter all members shall hold office for four years.

The advisory board in such improvement district may make recommendations to the district board solely as to matters pertaining to the operation of the system acquired from the Lakeside Ditch Company and the distribution of the water to which the shareholders of such company have rights. The district board shall follow any such recommendation unless it is rejected by the district board by unanimous vote of its members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1653.)
-------------------------------------------

31579.

All powers and duties of the district may be exercised on behalf of or within any improvement district formed pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 874.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Alternative Procedure for Formation of Improvement Districts [31585. - 31618.]



  ARTICLE 1. In General [31585. - 31586.]

31585.

The provisions of this chapter are in addition to the provisions of Sections 31388 and 31389, the provisions of Sections 31500 to 31548, inclusive, and the provisions of Sections 31575 to 31577, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------

31586.

Division 4 (commencing at Section 2800) of the Streets and Highways Code shall not be applicable to the formation of any improvement district pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Formation and Projects [31595. - 31611.]

31595.

Improvement districts may be formed to undertake projects to investigate, study, analyze, appraise, finance, acquire, and carry out any of the objects or purposes of this division of special benefit to such improvement districts, including, without limitation, projects to construct, operate, maintain, extend, repair or improve any work or improvement of special benefit to such improvement districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------

31596.

The formation of an improvement district shall be instituted by a resolution of the board which shall contain the following:

(a) A description of the boundaries of the improvement district proposed to be formed;

(b) A brief general description of the project to be undertaken within such improvement district;

(c) A finding that the project will be a special benefit to such improvement district;

(d) A statement of the board’s intention to undertake the project;

(e) An estimate of the cost of the project;

(f) The method by which the project is proposed to be financed. To the extent that the project is to be financed by taxes levied in such improvement district, for purposes other than the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds, the proposed maximum amount of such tax which may be levied in any year, which maximum shall not exceed seventy-five cents ($0.75) per one hundred dollars ($100) of the assessed value of the taxable property in such improvement district. To the extent that the project is to be financed by incurring a bonded indebtedness the resolution shall also comply with Section 31370. To the extent that the project is to be financed by taxes levied in such improvement district, for purposes other than the payment of the principal and interest on bonds, and said taxes are levied pursuant to Section 31703.7 of the Water Code, the proposed maximum amount of such tax which may be levied in any year, which maximum shall not exceed two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) per one hundred dollars ($100) of the assessed value of the land in such improvement district.

(g) The time and place for a hearing by the board on the formation of the proposed improvement district, on the boundaries thereof, on the project proposed to be undertaken therein and on the method by which the project is proposed to be financed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 441.)
-------------------------------------------

31597.

The secretary shall give notice of the time and place of the hearing by causing a notice thereof to be published for the time provided by Section 31371 in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published within the proposed improvement district, but if there is no such newspaper, then one within the district, but if there is no such newspaper, then one within the county in which the proposed improvement district is situated. Said publication shall be completed at least seven days prior to said hearing. The secretary shall also cause the notice to be posted in five conspicuous places within the proposed improvement district at least 10 days prior to said hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------

31598.

The notice shall contain a copy of the resolution and a designation of a public place within the district where a copy of a map of the proposed improvement district may be seen by any interested person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------

31599.

At the time and place fixed for the hearing, or at any time and place to which the hearing is adjourned, the board shall proceed with the hearing and shall consider all written and oral objections to any matters set forth in the resolution. Any person may appear at the hearing and present any matters material to the subject thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------

31600.

If prior to the conclusion of the hearing written protests against the formation of the proposed improvement district and the proposed project signed by a majority in number of the holders of title to taxable property within the proposed improvement district and who are also the holders of title to not less than 51 percent of the area thereof are filed with the board, further proceedings relating to the proposed improvement district and the proposed project shall be terminated and no proceedings for the formation of any improvement district to undertake the proposed project shall be instituted for a period of not less than six months following the date of the conclusion of the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------

31601.

In all matters referred to in this article, the last equalized assessment roll of the district, if any, otherwise of the county, shall be prima facie evidence as to the ownership of taxable property, the names and number of the persons who are the holders of title, or assessable rights therein, and as to the assessed valuation of taxable property within the proposed improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------

31602.

(a) Each signature on a protest shall be acknowledged or proved in the manner required to entitle deeds to be recorded.

(b) A guardian, executor, administrator, or other person holding property in a trust capacity under appointment of court may sign a protest when authorized by the proper court, which authorization may be made without notice. A certified copy of such authorization shall be filed with such protest.

(c) Where property is assessed in the name of a trustee or trustees, such trustee or trustees shall be deemed to be the person entitled to sign the protest. 

(d) The protest of any public or quasi-public corporation, private corporation, or unincorporated association may be signed by any person authorized by the board of directors or trustees or other managing body thereof, which authorization shall be in writing, attested by its seal, and duly acknowledged, and shall be filed with the board.

(e) The owner of any property or interest therein, appearing upon the assessment role, which has been assessed in the wrong name or to unknown owners, or which has passed from the owner appearing as such on the last equalized assessment roll, since the same was made, shall be entitled to sign the protest represented thereby, either by the production of a proxy executed and acknowledged by such former owner, or by furnishing evidence of his ownership by a conveyance duly acknowledged showing the title to be vested in the person claiming the right to sign the protest, accompanied by a certificate of a competent searcher of titles, certifying that a search of the official records of the county since the date of the conveyance discloses no conveyance or transfer out from the grantee or transferee named in the conveyance.

(f) Where the property has been contracted to be sold, the vendee shall be entitled to sign the protest, unless such real property is assessed in the name of the vendor, in which event the vendor shall be entitled to do so, unless the contract of sale otherwise expressly provides.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------

31603.

The board may inquire and take evidence for the purpose of identifying any person claiming the right to sign the protest as being the person shown on the assessment roll or otherwise as entitled thereto. Unless satisfactory evidence is furnished, the right to file said protest may be denied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------

31604.

At the conclusion of the hearing if proceedings relating to the proposed improvement district have not been terminated in the manner set forth in Section 31600 the board may, by resolution, declare that the proposed improvement district is formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------

31605.

No improvement district shall be formed pursuant to this chapter unless the board shall, in the resolution declaring such improvement district to be formed, find and declare that all taxable property located within the improvement district is equally benefited by the project proposed therefor, and if the board so finds and declares such determination shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------

31606.

The resolution declaring an improvement district to be formed shall contain:

(a) A description of the boundaries thereof and the name of such improvement district which shall thereupon constitute and be known as “Improvement District No. ____ of ____ County Water District.”

(b) A brief description of the project which may be undertaken within the improvement district.

(c) The maximum amount of any improvement district tax, exclusive of taxes for the payment of principal of and interest on bonds, which may be levied in any year, which maximum amount shall not exceed the amount estimated in the resolution adopted pursuant to Section 31596.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------

31607.
